Utah statutes.
31A-28-113.   Credit for assessments paid.
(1) (a)  A member insurer may offset against its premium tax liability to this
state an assessment described in Subsection 31A-28-109(2)(b) to the extent of
20% of the amount of the assessment for each of the five calendar years
following the year in which the assessment was paid.
(b)  To the extent that the offsets described in Subsection (1)(a) exceed
premium tax liability, the offsets may be carried forward and used to offset
premium tax liability in future years.
(c)  If a member insurer ceases doing business, all uncredited assessments may
be credited against its premium tax liability for the year it ceases doing
business.
(2) (a) Monies shall be paid by the insurers to the state in a manner required
by the State Tax Commission if the monies:
(i)  are acquired by refund in accordance with Subsection 31A-28-109(6) from
the association by member insurers; and
(ii)  have been offset against premium taxes as provided in Subsection (1).
(b)  The association shall notify the commissioner that the refunds described
in Subsection (2)(a) have been made.
